test/src/morphology/N-ilje_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - илʼ: # Noun 'life' - partial paradigm /Type 30/
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc: илмʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat: иландʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc: илӈгана
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl: илӈгад
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros: илмана
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom: [илӈгʼ, илаӈгʼ]
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc: [илӈгʼ, илаӈгʼ]
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen: [илӈгʼ, илаӈгʼ]
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom: илаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc: илъе
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen: илъеˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat: илӈгˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc: илӈгаˮна
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl: илӈгат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros: илъеˮмна    

     илʼ+N+Sg+Tra: илӈэ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Tra: илˮӈэ

# Possessive forms !Local case forms need to be checked!
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg1: [илм, илми]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg2: ил  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3: иланда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu1: иламиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu2: илиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxDu3: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl1: иламаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl2: илалаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Nom+PxPl3: иландоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg1: илами  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg2: иланд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxSg3: иланда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu1: иламиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu2: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxDu3: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl1: иламаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl2: иландаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Acc+PxPl3: иландоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg1: [илан, илани] 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: иланд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg3: иланда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu1: иланиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu2: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxDu3: иландиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl1: иланаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl2: иландаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Gen+PxPl3: иландоʼ  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: илӈган
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg1: илӈгани  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2: илӈганд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg3: илӈганда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu1: илӈганиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu2: илӈгандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxDu3: илӈгандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl1: илӈганаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl2: илӈгандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Dat+PxPl3: илӈгандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg1: [илӈганан, илӈганани]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg2: илӈгананд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxSg3: илӈгананда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu1: илӈгананиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu2: илӈганандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxDu3: илӈганандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl1: илӈгананаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl2: илӈганандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Loc+PxPl3: илӈганандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg1: [илӈгадан, илӈгадани]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg2: илӈгаданд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxSg3: илӈгаданда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu1: илӈгаданиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu2: илӈгадандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxDu3: илӈгадандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl1: илӈгаданаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl2: илӈгадандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Abl+PxPl3: илӈгадандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg1: [илмнан, илмнани]
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg2: илмнанд  
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxSg3: илмнанда 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu1: илмнаниʼ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu2: илмнандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxDu3: илмнандиʼ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl1: илмнанаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl2: илмнандаˮ
     илʼ+N+Sg+Pros+PxPl3: илмнандоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg1: илӈгаюн  
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg2: илӈгаюд  
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxSg3: илӈгаюда 
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu2: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl2: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Nom+PxPl3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg1: илӈгаюн  
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg2: илӈгаюд  
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxSg3: илӈгаюда 
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu2: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxDu3: илӈгаюдиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl2: илӈгаюдаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Acc+PxPl3: илӈгаюдоʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg1: илӈгаюн  
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg2: илӈгают  
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxSg3: илӈгаюта 
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu1: илӈгаюниʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu2: илӈгаютиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxDu3: илӈгаютиʼ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl1: илӈгаюнаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl2: илӈгаютаˮ
     илʼ+N+Du+Gen+PxPl3: илӈгаютоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: [илъен, илъени] 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg2: илъед   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg3: илъеда  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu1: илъениʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu2: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxDu3: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl1: илъенаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl2: илъедаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Nom+PxPl3: илъедоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg1: [илъен, илъени]   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg2: илъед   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxSg3: илъеда  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu1: илъениʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu2: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxDu3: илъедиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl1: илъенаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl2: илъедаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Acc+PxPl3: илъедоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg1: илъеˮн  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg2: илъет   
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxSg3: илъета  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu1: илъеˮниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu2: илъетиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxDu3: илъетиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl1: илъеˮнаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl2: илъетаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Gen+PxPl3: илъетоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg1: илахаˮн 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg2: илахат 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxSg3: илахата 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu1: илахаˮниʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu2: илахатиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxDu3: илахатиʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl1: илахаˮнаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl2: илахатаˮ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Dat+PxPl3: илахатоʼ 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg1: илахаˮнан  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg2: илахаˮнат
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxSg3: илахаˮната 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu1: илахаˮнаниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu2: илахаˮнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxDu3: илахаˮнатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl1: илахаˮнанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl2: илахаˮнатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Loc+PxPl3: илахаˮнатоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg1: илахатан 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg2: илахатат 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxSg3: илахатата 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu1: илахатаниʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu2: илахататиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxDu3: илахататиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl1: илахатанаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl2: илахататаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Abl+PxPl3: илахататоʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg1: илъеˮманан       
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg2: илъеˮманат  
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxSg3: илъеˮманата 
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu1: илъеˮмананиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu2: илъеˮманатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxDu3: илъеˮманатиʼ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl1: илъеˮмананаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl2: илъеˮманатаˮ
     илʼ+N+Pl+Pros+PxPl3: илъеˮманатоʼ

# Predestinative !Should be added
# Predicative (Nominal conjugation)

     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScSg1: илндмʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScSg2: илн  
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScSg3: илʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScDu1: илниʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScDu2: илндиʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScDu3: илӈгʼ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScPl1: илмаˮ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScPl2: илндаˮ
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Aor+ScPl3: илйˮ  
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScSg1: илндамзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScSg2: илнась 
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3: илнзь   
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScDu1: илнинзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScDu2: илдинзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScDu3: илӈганзь
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScPl1: илмаць 
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScPl2: илндаць 
     илʼ+N+Nom+Der/Pr+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: илнць   
